Wyoming, session 2025, HB0055.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Wyoming:

Section 1. W.S. 2-2-401(a)(iii), 5-2-202,
5-3-206(a)(i), (vii) and (x), 5-6-108(a)(i), 5-9-135,
5-13-202, 6-10-102 and 6-10-103 are amended to read:

2-2-401. Schedule; additional charges.

(a) For probate matters filed or commenced, the clerk
of the district court shall collect fees as follows:

HB0055

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0286
(iii) In addition to the original filing fee
under paragraph (a)(i) of this subsection, a court
automation fee in the amount of forty dollars ($40.00)
fifty dollars ($50.00), which shall be deposited into the
judicial systems automation account established by W.S.
5-2-120;

5-2-202. Collection of fees.

The clerk of the supreme court shall collect the following
fees from the plaintiff in error or appellant, or in case
of an original proceeding the plaintiff or relator shall,
at the time of filing the petition in error or record on
appeal or when commencing the cause in this court, the sum
of seventy-five dollars ($75.00). At the time of filing,
the clerk also shall collect a court automation fee in the
amount of fifty-five dollars ($55.00) sixty-five dollars
($65.00) which shall be deposited into the judicial systems
automation account established by W.S. 5-2-120, and an
indigent civil legal services fee in the amount of ten
dollars ($10.00) which shall be deposited into the indigent
civil legal services account established by W.S. 5-2-121.
Other fees or charges to be assessed within the clerk's
HB0055

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0286
office are to be determined under rules of the supreme
court.

5-3-206. Fees.

(a) For all civil matters filed or commenced, the
clerk of each district court shall charge the following
fees:

(i) For filing instruments or documents in each
civil action and certifying one (1) copy of any order,
decree or judgment at the time of its filing for each
party, an original filing fee of one hundred sixty dollars
($160.00) one hundred seventy dollars ($170.00), which
shall be paid by the plaintiff. This fee shall apply to
original actions commenced and to actions that are reopened
after a final decree previously has been entered. Forty
dollars ($40.00) Fifty dollars ($50.00) of the filing fee
shall be for court automation, ten dollars ($10.00) shall
be for indigent civil legal services and both shall be
remitted as provided in W.S. 5-3-205;

HB0055

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0286
(vii) For all transcripts in cases appealed to
the supreme court, one hundred dollars ($100.00) one
hundred ten dollars ($110.00), including certificates,
seals and transmission. Forty dollars ($40.00) Fifty
dollars ($50.00) of the fee under this paragraph shall be
for court automation, ten dollars ($10.00) shall be for
indigent civil legal services and both shall be remitted as
provided in W.S. 5-3-205;

(x) For docketing and in payment of clerk's fee
after docketing incident to any appeal or bill of exception
from a circuit court, one hundred dollars ($100.00) one
hundred ten dollars ($110.00), and for docketing any
transcript of judgment from a circuit court upon the
judgment and execution dockets, one hundred dollars
($100.00) one hundred ten dollars ($110.00), which amount
shall be paid by appellant, or by judgment holder to the
clerk at time of docketing. Forty dollars ($40.00) Fifty
dollars ($50.00) of any fee imposed under this paragraph
shall be for court automation, ten dollars ($10.00) shall
be for indigent civil legal services and both shall be
remitted as provided in W.S. 5-3-205.

HB0055

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0286
5-6-108. Costs.

(a) Each city or town in the state of Wyoming may
prescribe by ordinance such costs in all trials before
municipal courts as may be necessary or deemed expedient.
However, the costs shall not exceed ten dollars ($10.00).
All costs collected shall be turned into the treasury of
the city or town. By ordinance a city or town may
prescribe:

(i) A court automation fee of forty dollars
($40.00) fifty dollars ($50.00) as a cost to be paid by
every person guilty of a violation of a city or town
ordinance;

5-9-135. Filing fee.

For all civil matters the circuit court shall collect from
the plaintiff an original filing fee of twenty dollars
($20.00), a court automation fee of forty dollars ($40.00)
fifty dollars ($50.00), and an indigent civil legal
services fee of ten dollars ($10.00) excluding small claims
civil actions as provided in W.S. 1-21-201 through 1-21-205
HB0055

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0286
which shall have a filing fee of ten dollars ($10.00). The
court automation fee shall be deposited into the judicial
systems automation account and the indigent civil legal
services fee shall be deposited into the indigent civil
legal services account as provided by W.S. 5-9-144.

5-13-202. Collection of fees.

The clerk of the chancery court shall collect all fees and
charges as required and set by the supreme court under W.S.
5-13-104(b). At the time of the original filing, the clerk
also shall collect a court automation fee in the amount of
one hundred dollars ($100.00) one hundred ten dollars
($110.00) which shall be deposited into the judicial
systems automation account established by W.S. 5-2-120, and
an indigent civil legal services fee in the amount of ten
dollars ($10.00) which shall be deposited into the indigent
civil legal services account established by W.S. 5-2-121.

6-10-102. Imposition of fine for any felony; maximum
fine where not established by statute; court automation
fee; indigent civil legal services fee.

HB0055

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0286
The court may impose a fine as part of the punishment for
any felony. If the statute does not establish a maximum
fine, the fine shall be not more than ten thousand dollars
($10,000.00). The court shall impose a court automation fee
of forty dollars ($40.00) fifty dollars ($50.00) in every
criminal case wherein the defendant is found guilty, enters
a plea of guilty or no contest or is placed on probation
under W.S. 7-13-301. The fee shall be remitted as provided
by W.S. 5-3-205. In addition to the court automation fee
the court shall impose an indigent civil legal services fee
of ten dollars ($10.00) in every criminal case wherein the
defendant is found guilty, enters a plea of guilty or no
contest or is placed on probation under W.S. 7-13-301 or
35-7-1037. The indigent civil legal services fee shall be
remitted as provided in W.S. 5-3-205(a)(ii).

6-10-103. Penalties for misdemeanors where not
prescribed by statute; court automation fee; indigent civil
legal services fee.

Unless a different penalty is prescribed by law, every
crime declared to be a misdemeanor is punishable by
imprisonment in the county jail for not more than six (6)
HB0055

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0286
months, a fine of not more than seven hundred fifty dollars
($750.00), or both. The court shall impose a court
automation fee of forty dollars ($40.00) fifty dollars
($50.00) in every criminal case wherein the defendant is
found guilty, enters a plea of guilty or no contest or is
placed on probation under W.S. 7-13-301. The fee shall be
remitted as provided by W.S. 5-3-205. In addition to the
court automation fee the court shall impose an indigent
civil legal services fee of ten dollars ($10.00) in every
criminal case wherein the defendant is found guilty, enters
a plea of guilty or no contest or is placed on probation
under W.S. 7-13-301. The indigent civil legal services fee
shall be remitted as provided in W.S. 5-3-205(a)(ii).

Section 2. This act shall apply to all cases and
appeals initially filed on and after July 1, 2025.

Section 3. This act is effective July 1, 2025.

(END)
HB0055